Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2035.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5803YH (2) 91 dg/ko H.F. 2035 Section 1. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ CHILD 1 CARE PROVIDER REIMBURSEMENT RATES. The department of health 2 and human services shall amend the departmentâs rules pursuant 3 to chapter 17A to set half-day reimbursement rates for child 4 care providers reimbursed under the state child care assistance 5 program to the eighty-fifth percentile of the 2024 market rate 6 survey conducted by the department to analyze and evaluate the 7 market rate of child care services throughout the state. 8